Hawaii statutes.
§514B-69 Penalties. (a) Any person who
violates or fails to comply with this part, part V, section 514B‑103,
514B‑132, 514B‑134, 514B‑149, sections 514B‑152 to 514B‑154,
or section 514B‑154.5, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be
punished by a fine not exceeding $10,000, or by imprisonment for a term not
exceeding one year, or both. Any person who violates or fails to comply with
any rule, order, decision, demand, or requirement of the commission under this
part, part V, section 514B‑103, 514B‑132, 514B‑134, 514B‑149,
sections 514B‑152 to 514B‑154, or section 514B‑154.5, shall
be punished by a fine not exceeding $10,000.

(b) In addition to any other actions
authorized by law, any person who violates or fails to comply with this part,
part V, section 514B‑103, 514B‑132, 514B‑134, 514B‑149,
sections 514B‑152 to 514B‑154, section 514B‑154.5, or the
rules of the commission adopted pursuant thereto, shall also be subject to a
civil penalty not exceeding $10,000 for any violation. Each violation shall
constitute a separate offense. [L 2005, c 93, pt of §3; am L 2014, c 188, §7]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next